Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.161

Certification—Apprentices and trainees—Supervision—Ratio of noncertified and certified workers—Trainee hours verification.

(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade without having a valid master journey level electrician certificate of competency, journey level electrician certificate of competency, master specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair.

(2)(a) A person who is: (i) Registered in an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW or equivalent apprenticeship program approved by the department for the electrical construction trade; (ii) learning the electrical construction trade while working in a specialty; or (iii) learning the electrical construction trade in a program described in RCW 19.28.191(1) (e) or (f) for a journey level certificate of competency may work in the electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician in that electrician's specialty.

(b) All apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical training certificate from the department. The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while under the direct supervision of a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. The certificate may include a photograph of the holder. The holder of the electrical training certificate shall renew the certificate biennially. At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's employers in the electrical construction industry for the previous biennial period and the number of hours worked for each employer. The holder shall also provide proof of forty-eight hours of: Approved classroom training covering this chapter, the national electrical code, or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training taken as part of an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an approved electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(e). A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.

(c)(i) Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at the representative's request.

(ii) Unless working in a specialty, apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade must also have in their possession proof of apprenticeship or training program registration. They shall show their apprenticeship or training program registration documents to an authorized representative of the department at the representative's request.

(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training certificate under this chapter may work: (a) If that person is under supervision, and is (b) unless working in a specialty, (i) registered in an approved journey level apprenticeship program, as appropriate; or (ii) learning the electrical construction trade in a program described in RCW 19.28.191(1)(e) for a journey level certificate of competency. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same jobsite and under the control of either a certified master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Either a certified master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the same jobsite as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master journey level electricians, journey level electricians, master specialty electricians, or specialty electricians on any one jobsite is as follows:

(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journey level electrician, or journey level electrician, except that the ratio requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journey level electrician, or journey level electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive input and advice from the electrical board; and

(b) When working as a journey level electrician, not more than one noncertified individual for every certified master journey level electrician or journey level electrician, except that the ratio requirements shall be one certified master journey level electrician or journey level electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive input and advice from the electrical board.

An individual who has a current training certificate and who has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.

(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(g)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not including appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule, either a master journey level electrician, journey level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty must be on the same jobsite as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet the requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191(1)(d)(ii). When the ratio of certified electricians to noncertified individuals on a jobsite is one certified electrician to three or four noncertified individuals, the certified electrician must:

(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an electrical installation; and

(b) Be on the same jobsite as the noncertified individual for a minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.

(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of the electrical contractor.

[ 2018 c 249 s 2; 2013 c 23 s 29; 2010 c 33 s 1; 2009 c 36 s 7. Prior: 2006 c 224 s 2; 2006 c 185 s 6; 2002 c 249 s 4; 1997 c 309 s 1; 1996 c 241 s 6; 1983 c 206 s 13; 1980 c 30 s 2. Formerly RCW 19.28.510.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 249: See note following RCW 19.28.191.

Effective date—2010 c 33: "This act takes effect July 1, 2011." [ 2010 c 33 s 2.]

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.